Tennessee, session 114, HB1298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 4, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Speak UP, Tennessee
Scholarship Act."
(b) The Tennessee student assistance corporation (TSAC) shall promulgate
rules, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4,
chapter 5, to establish a program that provides scholarships for students in grade twelve
(12) and students enrolled in public institutions of higher education in this state who
demonstrate artistic excellence in spoken word poetry through a competitive,
performance-based selection process and who wish to pursue higher education to
further develop their literary and performance skills. The scholarships may be funded by
appropriations from the general assembly, grants, and private donations.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and subsequent school years.
HB1298
002804
- 1 -